srcV2/esu.twol
"t:c = tV--li/ci | te@y/c | te~s/c" 
t:c <=> _ [[ Vow:0 (Con:0) [Bndry:-%(u%):-AtSign:]* %–: %–: l:0 i ] / Sep ] ; ! te--li/ci
        _ [[ (') e:0 [Bndry:-%(u%):-%(ng%):-AtSign:]* i ] / Sep ] ; ! te~i/ci
        _ [[ (') e: (%°:) %:: %(u%|i%): m: ] / Sep ] ; ! te:(u/i)/ci
        _ [[ (') e: (%°:) [Bndry:-%(u%):-AtSign:]* %@ʸ: [Bndry:-%(u%):-AtSign:]* y: ] / Sep ] ; ! te@y/c
        _ [[ (') e: [Bndry:-%(u%):-AtSign:]* [s:|y:] ] / Sep ] ; ! te~s/c
    except
        [[ .#. ] / Sep ] _ ;

"t:l = Vte@²/l | te*@³(u)/l | te°@⁴gkng/l"
t:l <=> [[ Vow ] / [ Sep | Bndry: ] ] _ [[ (') e: %°: [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@²: ] / Sep ] ; ! Vte°@²mngv/l
        [[ Vow ] / [ Sep | Bndry: ] ] _ [[ (') e: %°: [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@³: ] / Sep ] ; ! Vte°@³(u)/l
        _ [[ (') e: %°: [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@⁴: ] / Sep ] ; ! te°@⁴gkng/l

"t:n = WordFinalVte"
t:n <=> [[ :Vow [Bndry:%>|:0]* ] / Sep ] _ [[ e: [ .#. | %= ] ] / Sep ] ; ! Word final Vte

"t:q = te@ˁ/q"
t:q <=> _ [[ (') e: (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@ˁ: ] / Sep ] ; ! te@ˁ/q

"t:s = Vte@²/s | Vt'e@³(u)/s'u | Cte@⁴gkng/s"
t:s <=> [[ Vow ] / [ Sep | Bndry: ] ] _ [[ (') e: [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@²: ] / Sep ] ; ! Vte@²mngv/s
        [[ Vow ] / [ Sep | Bndry: ] ] _ [[ ' e: [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@³: ] / Sep ] ; ! Vt'e@³(u)/s'u
        [[ [Vow|VlessFric:VoiceFric|Nasal|Stop] ] / [ Sep | Bndry: ] ] _ [[ (') e: [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@⁴: ] / Sep ] ; ! Cte@⁴gkng/s

"t:y = Vte@³(u)/Vy"
t:y <=> 
!        Vow _ [[ (') e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@²: ] / Sep ] ; ! Vte@²mngv/y  (for HBC)
        [[ [Vow|Nasal|Stop] ] / Sep ] _ [[ e: [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@³: ] / Sep ] ; ! Vte@³(u)/Vy    TODO: Add t'e/y' also for HBC
!        [Vow|VlessFric:VoiceFric|Nasal|Stop] _ [[ (') e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@⁴: ] / Sep ] ; ! Cte@⁴gkng/y for HBC  

"u:0 = --"
u:0 <=> _ [[ Con:0 Bndry:* %–: %–: l:0 ] / Sep ] ; ! "Rule for Double Minus" ! - optional drop preceding vowel also
    except
        [[ .#. :Con ] / Sep ] _ ; ! block meliur- -> miur-

"u͡gg:u͡g = u͡gte@(u)"
u͡gg:u͡g <=> _ [[ t:0 e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@³: ] / Sep ] ; ! CCte@³(u)/Cu
           _ [[ t:s (') e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@⁴: ] / Sep ] ; ! Cte@⁴gkng/s

"u͡rr:u͡r = u͡rte@(u)"
u͡rr:u͡r <=> _ [[ t:0 e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@³: ] / Sep ] ; ! CCte@³(u)/Cu
           _ [[ t:s (') e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@⁴: ] / Sep ] ; ! Cte@⁴gkng/s

"v:vv = @²v"
v:vv <=> [[ Con [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* t:0 e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@²: [Bndry:-AtSign:]* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! Cte@²v/Cvv

"vv:v = vte@(u)"
vv:v <=> _ [[ t:0 e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@³: ] / Sep ] ; ! CCte@³(u)/Cu
         _ [[ t:s (') e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@⁴: ] / Sep ] ; ! Cte@⁴gkng/s

"y:0 = te@y"
y:0 <=> [[ t:c (') e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-%(u%):-AtSign:]* %@ʸ: [Bndry:-%(u%):-AtSign:]* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! te@y/c
        [[ t:c (') e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-%(u%):-AtSign:]* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! tey/c
        [[ %(t%):c Bndry:* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! (t)y/c

"y:s = Stop@y" 
y:s <=> [[ [VlessCon-t] (e:0) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@ʸ: [Bndry:-AtSign:]* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! Stop@y/s
        [[ [VlessCon-t] (e:0) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! Stopy/s
    except
        [[ t:c (') e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@ʸ: [Bndry:-AtSign:]* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! te@y/c
        [[ t:c (') e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-%(u%):-AtSign:]* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! tey/c
        [[ %(t%):c Bndry:* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! (t)y/c

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!     ALLOMORPHS    !!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

"(e):a = %/:" ! - bases kept with percent and dropped by colon
%(e%):a <=> [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] [a:|ạ:] r: (%*:) %%:%> %:: ] / Sep ] _ [[ [Con:] ] / Sep ] ; ! ar*e -> aa

"(e):e = VV[r/g]%e | e:0%e"
%(e%):e <=> [[ :FVow :FVow [ r | g ] (%*:) %%:   %:: ] / Sep ] _ ;
        [[              e: [ r | g ] (%*:) %%:%> %:: ] / Sep ] _ ;
    except
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] [a:|ạ:] r: (%*:) %%:%> %:: ] / Sep ] _ [[ [Con:] ] / Sep ] ; ! ar*e -> aa
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] [a:|ạ:] g: (%*:) %%:%> %:: ] / Sep ] _ [[ [Con:] ] / Sep ] ; ! age -> ii
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] i: [g:|r:] (%*:) %%:%> %:: ] / Sep ] _ [[ [Con:] ] / Sep ] ; ! ige/ir*e -> ii
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] u: [g:|r:] (%*:) %%:%> %:: ] / Sep ] _ [[ [Con:] ] / Sep ] ; ! uge/ur*e -> uu

"(e):i = age/ii"
%(e%):i <=> [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] [a:|ạ:] g: (%*:) %%:%> %:: ] / Sep ] _ [[ [Con:] ] / Sep ] ; ! age -> ii
        [[     [.#.|%=:|:Con] i: [g:|r:] (%*:) %%:%> %:: ] / Sep ] _ [[ [Con:] ] / Sep ] ; ! ige/ir*e -> ii

"(e):u = %/:" ! - bases kept with percent and dropped by colon
%(e%):u <=> [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] u: [g:|r:] (%*:) %%:%> %:: ] / Sep ] _ [[ [Con:] ] / Sep ] ; ! uge/ur*e -> uu

"(g):g = VVFinalBase"
%(g%):g <=> [[ :Vow [:%>|:0]* :Vow [:%>|:0]* ] / Sep ] _ ;

"(g/t):g = VVFinalBase"
%(g%|t%):g <=> [[ :Vow [:%>|:0]* :Vow [:%>|:0]* ] / Sep ] _ ;
    except
        [[ :Con Bndry:* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! CFinalBase

"(g/t):t = CFinalBase"
%(g%|t%):t <=> [[ :Con Bndry:* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! CFinalBase

"(ng):ng = VFinalBase"
%(ng%):ng <=> [[ Vow: Bndry:* ] / Sep ] _ ;
    except
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] Vow: %:: ] / Sep ] _ [[ FVow: [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ] / Sep ] ; ! CV:(ng)VC -> CVVC
        [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] :FVow %:: %~: ] / Sep ] _ [[ FVow: [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ] / Sep ] ; ! CFV:~(ng)VC -> CVVC

"(ng):0 = :" ! - bases that get added then dropped after single vowel
%(ng%):0 <=> [[ [.#.|%=:|:Con] Vow: %:: ] / Sep ] _ [[ FVow: [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ] / Sep ] ; ! CV:(ng)VC -> CVVC
        [[      [.#.|%=:|:Con] :FVow %:: %~: ] / Sep ] _ [[ FVow: [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ] / Sep ] ; ! CFV:~(ng)VC -> CVVC
             ! 

"(r):r = te Bases"
%(r%):r <=> [[ :t :e %+: ] / Sep ] _ ; ! bases ending in te

"(s):s = VFinalBase"
%(s%):s <=> [[ Vow: Bndry:* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! bases ending in a vowel

"(t):t = CFinalBase"
%(t%):t <=> [[ :Con Bndry:* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! CFinalBase
    except
        [[ :Con Bndry:* ] / Sep ] _ [[ Bndry:* [s:|y:] ] / Sep ] ; ! (t)[sy]/c

"(t):c = (t)s/c"
%(t%):c <=> [[ :Con Bndry:* ] / Sep ] _ [[ Bndry:* [s:|y:] ] / Sep ] ; ! (t)[sy]/c

"(u):u = notFVow"
%(u%):u <=> [[ [Con:|e:] Bndry:* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! notFVow = Con|e

"(u/i):i = te:(u/i)/ci"
%(u%|i%):i <=> [[ t:c (') e: (%°:) %:: ] / Sep ] _ ; ! te:(u/i)/ci

"(u/i):u = [Con|e-te]:(u/i)/Cu"
%(u%|i%):u <=> [[ \:FVow %:: ] / Sep ] _ ; ! [Con|e-te]:(u/i)/Cu
    except
        [[ t:c (') e: (%°:) %:: ] / Sep ] _ ; ! te:(u/i)/ci

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!     OPERATOR      !!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

! "Rule for Plus" - useless
! "Rule for Period" - useless

"%:0 = percentWeak" ! percent weak
%%:0 <=> [[ [FVow|%=:] r: [Bndry:-%*:]* ] / Sep ] _ ;

"`:' = ApostropheRule"
%`:%' <=> [[ .#. (Con) Vow Con e:0 [ Bndry: - %~: ]* ] / Sep ] _ ; ! "Rule for Apostrophe - short bases"
